testing/sme-tests.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: sme/bin/sme-gen.hfst
    Morph: sme/bin/sme.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: sme/bin/isme-norm.fst
    Morph: sme/bin/sme-norm.fst

Tests:
  Noun - gåetie: # -ie stem, root vowel -åe-
    gåetie+N+Sg+Nom: gåetie
    gåetie+N+Sg+Acc: gåetiem
    gåetie+N+Sg+Gen: gåetien
    gåetie+N+Sg+Ill: gåatan
    gåetie+N+Sg+Ine: gåetesne
    gåetie+N+Sg+Ela: gåeteste
    gåetie+N+Sg+Com: [gåetine, göötine]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Nom: gåetieh
    gåetie+N+Pl+Acc: [gåetide, göötide]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Gen: [gåetiej, gööti]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Ill: [gåetide, göötide]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Ine: [gåetine, göötine]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Ela: [gåetijste, göötijste]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Com: [gåetiejgujmie, göötigujmie]
    gåetie+N+Ess: [gåetine, göötine]
